Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-1016
Trust deed; transfer of debt secured by; effect.

The transfer of any debt secured by a trust deed shall operate as a transfer of the security therefor.

Laws 1965, c. 451, § 16, p. 1432.